Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2922.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 397 of Title 59, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This section shall modify the Oklahoma Administrative Code
Section 235:10-11-1 by the following provisions:
1. Penalties for vendor payments may only be imposed after a
formal court judgment;
2. Penalties may only be imposed on funeral establishments and
may not be imposed against the Funeral Director in Charge;
3. These rules are only applicable to active funeral
establishments;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2922 Page 1

4. All funeral establishments must be in compliance with
federal bankruptcy laws; and
5. All cash payments made in advance must meet the requirements
of consumer fund receipts.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate











ENGR. H. B. NO. 2922 Page 2